Maryland, session 2026, HB1051.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 59. MEDS–TO–BEDS PROGRAM.
13–5901.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “PROGRAM” MEANS THE MEDS–TO–BEDS PROGRAM.
13–5902.
(A) (1) THERE IS A MEDS–TO–BEDS PROGRAM IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO REDUCE HOSPITAL
READMISSIONS BY USING A LICENSED PHARMACIST TO DELIVER DISCHARGE
MEDICATIONS TO PATIENTS BEFORE THE PATIENT LEAVES THE HOSPITAL.
(B) EACH HOSPITAL IN THE STATE SHALL PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THE
PROGRAM.
15–141.2.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Distant site” means a site at which the distant site health care provider
is located at the time the health care service is provided through telehealth.
(3) “Distant site provider” means the health care provider who provides
medically necessary services to a patient at an originating site from a different physical
location than the location of the patient.
(4) “Health care provider” means:

HOUSE BILL 1051 3
(i) A person who is licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized under
the Health Occupations Article to provide health care in the ordinary course of business or
practice of a profession or in an approved education or training program;
(ii) A mental health and substance use disorder program licensed in
accordance with § 7.5–401 of this article;
(iii) A person licensed under Title 7, Subtitle 9 of this article to
provide services to an individual with developmental disability or a recipient of individual
support services; or
(iv) A provider as defined under § 16–201.4 of this article to provide
services to an individual receiving long–term care services.
(5) “Originating site” means the location of the Program recipient at the
time the health care service is provided through telehealth.
(6) “Remote patient monitoring services” means the use of synchronous or
asynchronous digital technologies that collect or monitor medical, patient–reported, and
other forms of health care data for Program recipients at an originating site and
electronically transmit that data to a distant site provider to enable the distant site
provider to assess, diagnose, consult, treat, educate, provide care management, suggest
self–management, or make recommendations regarding the Program recipient’s health
care.
(7) (i) “Telehealth” means the delivery of medically necessary somatic,
dental, or behavioral health services to a patient at an originating site by a distant site
provider through the use of technology–assisted communication.
(ii) “Telehealth” includes:
1. Synchronous and asynchronous interactions;
2. An audio–only telephone conversation between a health
care provider and a patient that results in the delivery of a billable, covered health care
service; [and]
3. Remote patient monitoring services; AND
4. AUTOMATED DRUG DISPENSING SYSTEMS AND
REMOTE DISPENSING SYSTEMS AS THOSE TERMS ARE DEFINED IN § 19–2701 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(iii) “Telehealth” does not include the provision of health care
services solely through:

HOUSE BILL 1051
1. Except as provided in subparagraph (ii)2 of this
paragraph, an audio–only telephone conversation;
2. An e–mail message; or
3. A facsimile transmission.
(b) The Program shall:
(1) Provide health care services appropriately delivered through telehealth
to Program recipients regardless of the location of the Program recipient at the time
telehealth services are provided; and
(2) Allow a distant site provider to provide health care services to a
Program recipient from any location at which the health care services may be appropriately
delivered through telehealth.
(c) The services required to be provided under subsection (b) of this section shall
include counseling and treatment for substance use disorders and mental health conditions.
(d) The Program may not:
(1) Exclude from coverage a health care service solely because it is provided
through telehealth and is not provided through an in–person consultation or contact
between a health care provider and a patient; or
(2) Exclude from coverage a behavioral health care service provided to a
Program recipient in person solely because the service may also be provided through
telehealth.
(e) The Program may undertake utilization review, including preauthorization,
to determine the appropriateness of any health care service whether the service is delivered
through an in–person consultation or through telehealth if the appropriateness of the
health care service is determined in the same manner.
(f) The Program may not distinguish between Program recipients in rural or
urban locations in providing coverage under the Program for health care services delivered
through telehealth.
(g) (1) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, the Program shall
reimburse a health care provider for the diagnosis, consultation, and treatment of a
Program recipient for a health care service covered by the Program that can be
appropriately provided through telehealth.
(2) This subsection does not require the Program to reimburse a health
care provider for a health care service delivered in person or through telehealth that is:

HOUSE BILL 1051 5
(i) Not a covered health care service under the Program; or
(ii) Delivered by an out–of–network provider unless the health care
service is a self–referred service authorized under the Program.
(3) (i) When appropriately provided through telehealth, the Program
shall provide reimbursement in accordance with paragraph (1) of this subsection on the
same basis and the same rate as if the health care service were delivered by the health care
provider in person.
(ii) The reimbursement required under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph does not include:
1. Clinic facility fees unless the health care service is
provided by a health care provider not authorized to bill a professional fee separately for
the health care service; or
2. Any room and board fees.
(h) (1) The Department may specify in regulation the types of health care
providers eligible to receive reimbursement for health care services provided to Program
recipients under this section.
(2) If the Department specifies by regulation the types of health care
providers eligible to receive reimbursement for health care services provided to Program
recipients under this subsection, the regulations shall include all types of health care
providers that appropriately provide telehealth services.
(3) For the purpose of reimbursement and any fidelity standards
established by the Department, a health care service provided through telehealth is
equivalent to the same health care service when provided through an in–person
consultation.
(i) Subject to subsection (g)(2) of this section, the Program or a managed care
organization that participates in the Program may not impose as a condition of
reimbursement of a covered health care service delivered through telehealth that the
health care service be provided by a third–party vendor designated by the Program.
(j) The Department may adopt regulations to carry out this section.
(k) The Department shall obtain any federal authority necessary to implement
the requirements of this section, including applying to the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services for an amendment to any of the State’s § 1115 waivers or the State plan.
(l) This section may not be construed to supersede the authority of the Health
Services Cost Review Commission to set the appropriate rates for hospitals, including
setting the hospital facility fee for hospital–provided telehealth.

HOUSE BILL 1051
SUBTITLE 27. PRESCRIPTION DRUG DISPENSING SYSTEMS.
19–2701.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ADMINISTRATION” MEANS THE DIRECT APPLICATION OF A
CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE BY INJECTION, INHALATION, INGESTION, OR ANY OTHER
MEANS TO THE BODY OF A PATIENT BY:
(1) AN AUTHORIZED PRESCRIBER OR ANOTHER AUTHORIZED
INDIVIDUAL; OR
(2) THE PATIENT AT THE DIRECTION AND IN THE PRESENCE OF THE
AUTHORIZED PRESCRIBER WHO PRESCRIBED THE CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE.
(C) “AUTHORIZED PRESCRIBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 12–101 OF
THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE.
(D) “AUTOMATED DRUG DISPENSING SYSTEM” MEANS A MECHANICAL OR
ELECTRONIC SYSTEM THAT PERFORMS OPERATIONS OR ACTIVITIES, OTHER THAN
COMPOUNDING, AS DEFINED IN § 12–101 OF THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE,
OR ADMINISTRATION, RELATING TO PHARMACY SERVICES, INCLUDING:
(1) THE STORAGE, DISPENSING, OR DISTRIBUTION OF DRUGS; AND
(2) THE COLLECTION, CONTROL, AND MAINTENANCE OF ALL
TRANSACTION INFORMATION REGARDING THE SECURITY OF DRUGS IN THE SYSTEM.
(E) “BOARD” MEANS THE STATE BOARD OF PHARMACY.
(F) “DISPENSE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–401 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(G) “DRUG” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 21–101 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(H) “FACILITY” MEANS A HOSPITAL OR NURSING FACILITY, INCLUDING AN
INTERMEDIATE CARE FACILITY, SKILLED NURSING FACILITY, COMPREHENSIVE
CARE FACILITY, OR EXTENDED CARE FACILITY.

HOUSE BILL 1051 7
(I) “PHARMACIST–IN–CHARGE” MEANS A PHARMACIST WHO HOLDS A
LICENSE ISSUED BY THE BOARD AND IS DESIGNATED BY A FACILITY TO ENSURE
COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE.
(J) “REMOTE DISPENSING SYSTEM” MEANS A PROFILE–DRIVEN
AUTOMATED DRUG DISPENSING SYSTEM THAT PERFORMS OPERATIONS OR
ACTIVITIES RELATING TO THE STORAGE, PACKAGING, LABELING, OR DISPENSING OF
MEDICATIONS USING BIDIRECTIONAL AUDIO–VISUAL TECHNOLOGY TO:
(1) FACILITATE PHARMACIST COMMUNICATION WITH A PATIENT, AN
AUTHORIZED AGENT OF THE PATIENT, OR AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO
ADMINISTER DRUGS; AND
(2) COLLECT, CONTROL, AND MAINTAIN ALL INFORMATION
REGARDING THE SYSTEM ONLINE.
19–2702.
(A) A FACILITY MAY USE AN AUTOMATED DRUG DISPENSING SYSTEM OR
REMOTE DISPENSING SYSTEM IF:
(1) A DRUG STORED, DISPENSED, OR DISTRIBUTED BY THE
AUTOMATED DRUG DISPENSING SYSTEM OR REMOTE DISPENSING SYSTEM IS:
(I) PLACED IN THE AUTOMATED DRUG DISPENSING SYSTEM OR
REMOTE DISPENSING SYSTEM IN A FACILITY; AND
(II) UNDER THE CONTROL OF THE PHARMACY THAT PROVIDES
SERVICES TO THE FACILITY;
(2) THE PHARMACIST–IN–CHARGE HAS ESTABLISHED PROCEDURES
FOR ENSURING:
(I) THE ACCURATE STOCKING AND PROPER STORAGE OF
DRUGS IN THE AUTOMATED DRUG DISPENSING SYSTEM OR REMOTE DISPENSING
SYSTEM; AND
(II) ACCOUNTABILITY FOR AND SECURITY OF ALL DRUGS IN AN
AUTOMATED DRUG DISPENSING SYSTEM OR A REMOTE DISPENSING SYSTEM UNTIL
THE TIME DRUGS ARE REMOVED FROM THE AUTOMATED DRUG DISPENSING SYSTEM
OR REMOTE DISPENSING SYSTEM FOR ADMINISTRATION TO PATIENTS;

HOUSE BILL 1051
(3) THE REMOVAL OF A DRUG FROM AN AUTOMATED DRUG
DISPENSING SYSTEM OR REMOTE DISPENSING SYSTEM FOR ADMINISTRATION TO A
PATIENT IS MADE ACCORDING TO:
(I) A WRITTEN PRESCRIPTION;
(II) AN ELECTRONIC PRESCRIPTION, AS DEFINED IN § 5–101 OF
THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE; OR
(III) AN ORAL PRESCRIPTION FROM AN AUTHORIZED
PRESCRIBER;
(4) THE FACILITY PROVIDES ADEQUATE SECURITY FOR AUTOMATED
DRUG DISPENSING SYSTEMS OR REMOTE DISPENSING SYSTEMS BY ESTABLISHING
AND ADHERING TO WRITTEN POLICIES AND PROCEDURES FOR:
(I) PREVENTING UNAUTHORIZED ACCESS;
(II) COMPLYING WITH FEDERAL AND STATE REGULATIONS
GOVERNING PRESCRIBING AND DISPENSING CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES;
(III) MAINTAINING PATIENT CONFIDENTIALITY; AND
(IV) ENSURING COMPLIANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF
THIS SECTION;
(5) THE PHARMACIST–IN–CHARGE IS ACCOUNTABLE FOR ALL DRUGS
DISPENSED FROM AN AUTOMATED DRUG DISPENSING SYSTEM OR A REMOTE
DISPENSING SYSTEM;
(6) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE FILLING AND
STOCKING OF ALL DRUGS IN AN AUTOMATED DRUG DISPENSING SYSTEM OR A
REMOTE DISPENSING SYSTEM IS PERFORMED UNDER THE DIRECTION OF THE
PHARMACIST–IN–CHARGE AND IN ACCORDANCE WITH STANDARDS DESCRIBED IN A
POLICY AND PROCEDURE MANUAL MAINTAINED BY THE PROVIDER PHARMACY; AND
(7) EXCEPT WHEN THE AUTOMATED DRUG DISPENSING SYSTEM IS
USED EXCLUSIVELY FOR THE ADMINISTRATION OF DRUGS FOR EMERGENCIES, A
PHARMACY LOCATED OUTSIDE THE FACILITY IT SERVICES IS REQUIRED TO OBTAIN:
(I) A CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES REGISTRATION ISSUED:

HOUSE BILL 1051 9
1. IN THE NAME OF THE PHARMACY AT THE ADDRESS OF
THE FACILITY; AND
2. BY THE OFFICE OF CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES
ADMINISTRATION UNDER § 5–301(A)(1) OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE; AND
(II) IF REQUIRED, A REGISTRATION FROM THE FEDERAL DRUG
ENFORCEMENT ADMINISTRATION BEFORE STOCKING CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES
IN SCHEDULES II THROUGH VI UNDER TITLE 5, SUBTITLE 4 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW
ARTICLE.
(B) (1) THE FILLING AND STOCKING OF DRUGS INTO AN AUTOMATED
DRUG DISPENSING SYSTEM OR A REMOTE DISPENSING SYSTEM SHALL BE
PERFORMED BY:
(I) A PHARMACIST; OR
(II) A REGISTERED PHARMACY TECHNICIAN WHO:
1. IS AN EMPLOYEE OF THE PHARMACY THAT IS
SUPPLYING THE DRUGS; AND
2. IS PROPERLY TRAINED ON STANDARDS FOR FILLING
AND STOCKING AN AUTOMATED DRUG DISPENSING SYSTEM OR A REMOTE
DISPENSING SYSTEM IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE STANDARDS DESCRIBED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A)(6) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE PHARMACIST WHO STOCKS AND FILLS AN AUTOMATED DRUG
DISPENSING SYSTEM OR A REMOTE DISPENSING SYSTEM OR, IF AN AUTOMATED
DRUG DISPENSING SYSTEM OR A REMOTE DISPENSING SYSTEM IS STOCKED AND
FILLED BY A REGISTERED PHARMACY TECHNICIAN, THE PHARMACIST–IN–CHARGE,
IS RESPONSIBLE FOR ENSURING THE STANDARDS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (A)(6)
OF THIS SECTION HAVE BEEN MET.
(C) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED BY THE BOARD, DRUGS PLACED
INTO AND REMOVED FROM AN AUTOMATED DRUG DISPENSING SYSTEM OR A
REMOTE DISPENSING SYSTEM FOR ADMINISTRATION TO PATIENTS SHALL BE:
(1) IN THE MANUFACTURER’S OR DISTRIBUTOR’S SEALED ORIGINAL
PACKAGING;
(2) IN UNIT–DOSE CONTAINERS PACKAGED BY THE PHARMACY; OR

HOUSE BILL 1051
(3) IF APPROVED BY THE PHARMACIST–IN–CHARGE AND IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE FACILITY:
(I) IN MULTIDOSE PACKAGING; OR
(II) IF THE DRUG IS IN A LIQUID, INJECTABLE, OR INHALED
FORMULATION, IN A DEVICE, AS DEFINED IN § 3–401 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(D) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE PHARMACIST–IN–CHARGE SHALL ESTABLISH PROCEDURES FOR:
(I) PERIODICALLY INSPECTING AND AUDITING AUTOMATED
DRUG DISPENSING SYSTEMS AND REMOTE DISPENSING SYSTEMS TO ENSURE THE
PROPER STORAGE, SECURITY, AND ACCOUNTABILITY FOR ALL DRUGS PLACED IN
AND REMOVED FROM AUTOMATED DRUG DISPENSING SYSTEMS AND REMOTE
DISPENSING SYSTEMS; AND
(II) REVIEWING THE OPERATION AND MAINTENANCE OF
AUTOMATED DRUG DISPENSING SYSTEMS AND REMOTE DISPENSING SYSTEMS.
(2) IF A PHARMACY IS LOCATED WITHIN A HOSPITAL, A PHARMACIST
SHALL REVIEW THE OPERATION AND MAINTENANCE OF THE AUTOMATED DRUG
DISPENSING SYSTEM OR REMOTE DISPENSING SYSTEM:
(I) WHILE ON THE PREMISES OF THE HOSPITAL; AND
(II) FOR COMPLIANCE WITH THE PROCEDURES AND
REGULATIONS ESTABLISHED BY THE PHARMACIST–IN–CHARGE AND THE BOARD.
(E) THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS:
(1) ESTABLISHING MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS FOR:
(I) RANDOM PERIODIC INSPECTION AND MONTHLY AUDITS OF
AUTOMATED DRUG DISPENSING SYSTEMS AND REMOTE DISPENSING SYSTEMS TO
ENSURE THE PROPER STORAGE, SECURITY, AND ACCOUNTABILITY OF ALL DRUGS
PLACED IN AND REMOVED FROM THE AUTOMATED DRUG DISPENSING SYSTEMS AND
REMOTE DISPENSING SYSTEMS; AND
(II) REVIEWING THE OPERATION AND MAINTENANCE OF
AUTOMATED DRUG DISPENSING SYSTEMS AND REMOTE DISPENSING SYSTEMS;

HOUSE BILL 1051 11
(2) IDENTIFYING WHERE AUTOMATED DRUG DISPENSING SYSTEMS
AND REMOTE DISPENSING SYSTEMS MAY BE LOCATED; AND
(3) TO ENSURE THE SECURITY OF DRUGS, CONFIDENTIALITY OF
PROTECTED HEALTH INFORMATION, AND APPROPRIATE RECORD KEEPING.
Article – Health Occupations
12–515.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “PRESCRIPTION PROCESSING” MEANS ANY OF
THE FOLLOWING ACTIVITIES RELATED TO DISPENSING PRESCRIPTION DRUGS:
(I) RECEIVING, INTERPRETING, ANALYZING, OR CLARIFYING
PRESCRIPTIONS;
(II) ENTERING PRESCRIPTION AND PATIENT DATA INTO A DATA
PROCESSING SYSTEM;
(III) TRANSFERRING PRESCRIPTION INFORMATION;
(IV) PERFORMING A PROSPECTIVE DRUG REVIEW;
(V) OBTAINING REFILL OR SUBSTITUTION AUTHORIZATIONS OR
OTHERWISE COMMUNICATING WITH A PRESCRIBER CONCERNING A PATIENT’S
PRESCRIPTION;
(VI) INTERPRETING CLINICAL DATA FOR PRIOR
AUTHORIZATION FOR DISPENSING;
(VII) PERFORMING THERAPEUTIC INTERVENTIONS; OR
(VIII) PROVIDING DRUG INFORMATION OR COUNSELING
CONCERNING A PATIENT’S PRESCRIPTION TO A PATIENT OR A PATIENT’S AGENT.
(2) “PRESCRIPTION PROCESSING” DOES NOT INCLUDE THE
DISPENSING OF A PRESCRIPTION DRUG.
(B) A PHARMACY MAY OUTSOURCE PRESCRIPTION PROCESSING TO
ANOTHER PHARMACY IN THE STATE OR A PHARMACY LOCATED IN ANOTHER STATE
IF:
(1) EACH PHARMACY HAS:

HOUSE BILL 1051
(I) THE SAME OWNER; OR
(II) ENTERED INTO A WRITTEN CONTRACT THAT DESCRIBES:
1. THE SCOPE OF SERVICES TO BE PROVIDED; AND
2. THE RESPONSIBILITIES AND ACCOUNTABILITIES OF
EACH PHARMACY IN COMPLIANCE WITH ALL FEDERAL AND STATE LAWS AND
REGULATIONS RELATED TO THE PRACTICE OF PHARMACY;
(2) EACH PHARMACY COMPLIES WITH STATE LAW AND REGULATION
RELATING TO:
(I) THE REQUIREMENTS FOR SUPERVISION OF PHARMACY
TECHNICIANS; AND
(II) THE DUTIES THAT ARE RESTRICTED TO PHARMACISTS AND
PHARMACY TECHNICIANS;
(3) A PHARMACIST LICENSED IN THE STATE, REGARDLESS OF THE
LOCATION OF THE PHARMACY AT WHICH THE PRESCRIPTION PROCESSING IS BEING
PERFORMED, PERFORMS A CHECK FOR ACCURACY ON ALL PRESCRIPTION
PROCESSING DONE BY A PHARMACY IN ANOTHER STATE; AND
(4) EACH PHARMACY SHARES A COMMON ELECTRONIC FILE OR HAS
TECHNOLOGY THAT ALLOWS SUFFICIENT INFORMATION SHARING NECESSARY TO
PERFORM PRESCRIPTION PROCESSING.
(C) (1) A PHARMACY THAT OUTSOURCES PRESCRIPTION PROCESSING TO
ANOTHER PHARMACY SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE TO ALL PATIENTS THAT THE
PHARMACY OUTSOURCES PRESCRIPTION PROCESSING.
(2) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A PHARMACY
MAY SATISFY THE NOTIFICATION REQUIREMENT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION BY POSTING A SIGN IN THE PHARMACY IN A LOCATION THAT IS READILY
VISIBLE TO THE PUBLIC.
(3) THE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL STATE:
(I) THE NAME OF ANY CONTRACT PHARMACY PROVIDING
PRESCRIPTION PROCESSING; AND

HOUSE BILL 1051 13
(II) IF APPLICABLE, THAT THE PHARMACY USES A NETWORK OF
PHARMACIES UNDER COMMON OWNERSHIP.
(D) (1) EACH PHARMACY SHALL DEVELOP, MAINTAIN, AND MAKE
AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC A POLICY AND PROCEDURE MANUAL THAT GOVERNS THE
OUTSOURCING PRESCRIPTION PROCESSING.
(2) THE MANUAL REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING, AT A MINIMUM:
(I) THE RESPONSIBILITIES OF EACH PHARMACY INVOLVED IN
PRESCRIPTION PROCESSING FOR THE PHARMACY;
(II) A LIST OF THE NAMES, ADDRESSES, TELEPHONE NUMBERS,
AND PERMIT OR REGISTRATION NUMBERS OF ALL PHARMACIES INVOLVED IN
PRESCRIPTION PROCESSING FOR THE PHARMACY;
(III) PROCEDURES FOR PROTECTING THE CONFIDENTIALITY
AND INTEGRITY OF PATIENT INFORMATION;
(IV) PROCEDURES FOR ENSURING THAT PHARMACISTS
PERFORMING PROSPECTIVE DRUG REVIEWS HAVE ACCESS TO APPROPRIATE DRUG
INFORMATION RESOURCES;
(V) PROCEDURES FOR MAINTAINING REQUIRED RECORDS;
(VI) PROCEDURES FOR COMPLYING WITH ALL APPLICABLE
LAWS AND REGULATIONS, INCLUDING LAWS AND REGULATIONS RELATED TO
COUNSELING;
(VII) PROCEDURES FOR OBJECTIVELY AND SYSTEMATICALLY
MONITORING AND EVALUATING THE QUALITY OF THE PRESCRIPTION PROCESSING
THAT HAS BEEN OUTSOURCED TO RESOLVE PROBLEMS AND IMPROVE SERVICES;
AND
(VIII) PROCEDURES FOR ANNUALLY REVIEWING THE WRITTEN
POLICIES AND PROCEDURES FOR ANY NEEDED MODIFICATION.
(E) A PHARMACY THAT OUTSOURCES PRESCRIPTION PROCESSING SHALL
MAINTAIN RECORDS THAT SHOW, FOR EACH PRESCRIPTION PROCESSED:
(1) EACH INDIVIDUAL WHO PERFORMED THE PRESCRIPTION
PROCESSING; AND

HOUSE BILL 1051
(2) IF APPLICABLE, THE PHARMACIST WHO REVIEWED THE
PRESCRIPTION PROCESSING.
(F) (1) A RECORD MAINTAINED UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION
MAY BE MAINTAINED:
(I) SEPARATELY BY EACH PHARMACY; OR
(II) IN A COMMON ELECTRONIC FILE SHARED BY BOTH
PHARMACIES IF THE SYSTEM CAN PRODUCE A RECORD SHOWING:
1. EACH PRESCRIPTION PROCESSING TASK;
2. THE IDENTITY OF THE INDIVIDUAL PERFORMING
EACH TASK; AND
3. THE LOCATION AT WHICH EACH PRESCRIPTION
PROCESSING TASK WAS PERFORMED.
(2) EACH RECORD SHALL BE:
(I) MAINTAINED IN A RETRIEVABLE FORM FOR AT LEAST 2
YEARS; AND
(II) AVAILABLE FOR INSPECTION BY THE BOARD.
(G) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT AN INDIVIDUAL
EMPLOYEE LICENSED AS A PHARMACIST IN THE STATE FROM ACCESSING THE
EMPLOYER PHARMACY’S DATABASE FROM A REMOTE LOCATION FOR THE PURPOSE
OF PERFORMING PRESCRIPTION PROCESSING IF THE PHARMACY ESTABLISHES
CONTROLS TO PROTECT THE PRIVACY AND SECURITY OF CONFIDENTIAL RECORDS.
Article – Insurance
15–139.
(a) (1) In this section, “telehealth” means, as it relates to the delivery of health
care services, the use of interactive audio, video, or other telecommunications or electronic
technology by a licensed health care provider to deliver a health care service within the
scope of practice of the health care provider at a location other than the location of the
patient.
(2) “Telehealth” includes:

HOUSE BILL 1051 15
(I) an audio–only telephone conversation between a health care
provider and a patient that results in the delivery of a billable, covered health care service;
AND
(II) AUTOMATED DRUG DISPENSING SYSTEMS AND REMOTE
DISPENSING SYSTEMS, AS THOSE TERMS ARE DEFINED IN § 19–2701 OF THE HEALTH
– GENERAL ARTICLE.
(3) “Telehealth” does not include:
(i) except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, an
audio–only telephone conversation between a health care provider and a patient;
(ii) an electronic mail message between a health care provider and a
patient; or
(iii) a facsimile transmission between a health care provider and a
patient.
(b) This section applies to:
(1) insurers and nonprofit health service plans that provide hospital,
medical, or surgical benefits to individuals or groups on an expense–incurred basis under
health insurance policies or contracts that are issued or delivered in the State; and
(2) health maintenance organizations that provide hospital, medical, or
surgical benefits to individuals or groups under contracts that are issued or delivered in
the State.
(c) (1) An entity subject to this section:
(i) shall provide coverage under a health insurance policy or
contract for health care services appropriately delivered through telehealth regardless of
the location of the patient at the time the telehealth services are provided;
(ii) may not exclude from coverage a health care service solely
because it is provided through telehealth and is not provided through an in–person
consultation or contact between a health care provider and a patient; and
(iii) may not exclude from coverage or deny coverage for a behavioral
health care service that is a covered benefit under a health insurance policy or contract
when provided in person solely because the behavioral health care service may also be
provided through a covered telehealth benefit.

HOUSE BILL 1051
(2) The health care services appropriately delivered through telehealth
shall include counseling and treatment for substance use disorders and mental health
conditions.
(d) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, an entity subject to this
section:
(i) shall reimburse a health care provider for the diagnosis,
consultation, and treatment of an insured patient for a health care service covered under a
health insurance policy or contract that can be appropriately provided through telehealth;
(ii) is not required to:
1. reimburse a health care provider for a health care service
delivered in person or through telehealth that is not a covered benefit under the health
insurance policy or contract; or
2. reimburse a health care provider who is not a covered
provider under the health insurance policy or contract; and
(iii) 1. may impose a deductible, copayment, or coinsurance
amount on benefits for health care services that are delivered either through an in–person
consultation or through telehealth;
2. may impose an annual dollar maximum as permitted by
federal law; and
3. may not impose a lifetime dollar maximum.
(2) (i) When a health care service is appropriately provided through
telehealth, an entity subject to this section shall provide reimbursement in accordance with
paragraph (1)(i) of this subsection on the same basis and at the same rate as if the health
care service were delivered by the health care provider in person.
(ii) The reimbursement required under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph does not include:
1. clinic facility fees unless the health care service is
provided by a health care provider not authorized to bill a professional fee separately for
the health care service; or
2. any room and board fees.
(iii) This paragraph may not be construed to supersede the authority
of the Health Services Cost Review Commission to set the appropriate rates for hospitals,
including setting the hospital facility fee for hospital–provided telehealth.

HOUSE BILL 1051 17
(e) Subject to subsection (d)(1)(ii) of this section, an entity subject to this section
may not impose as a condition of reimbursement of a covered health care service delivered
through telehealth that the health care service be provided by a third–party vendor
designated by the entity.
(f) An entity subject to this section may undertake utilization review, including
preauthorization, to determine the appropriateness of any health care service whether the
service is delivered through an in–person consultation or through telehealth if the
appropriateness of the health care service is determined in the same manner.
(g) A health insurance policy or contract may not distinguish between patients in
rural or urban locations in providing coverage under the policy or contract for health care
services delivered through telehealth.
(h) A decision by an entity subject to this section not to provide coverage for
telehealth in accordance with this section constitutes an adverse decision, as defined in §
15–10A–01 of this title, if the decision is based on a finding that telehealth is not medically
necessary, appropriate, or efficient.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.